Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB197.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 95A.265 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created a safety education fund to be administered by the Kentucky
Fire Commission to initiate education programs in the public schools and other
agencies to reduce and prevent injuries and the loss of life. The fund shall:
(a) Provide funding for a statewide "Risk Watch" program to be implemented in
the public schools;
(b) Provide funding for statewide fire safety initiatives and programs including
the "Learn Not to Burn" program; and
(c) Allot grants to local fire departments to provide resources for public
education programs.
(2) The commission shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish the criteria
for providing funds to initiate injury prevention curricula and training programs
throughout the state. The funding criteria shall include requirements that the
recipients of funds work in cooperation with other agencies to establish the
programs.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed